Maryland, session 2025, HB1387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
23–102.
This title applies only in Howard County.
23–1904.
(a) (1) The holder of a Class A OR CLASS D license or an employee of the
license holder may deliver alcoholic beverages only within the county.
(2) An employee making a delivery shall meet the age requirements of §
23–1902 of this subtitle.
(b) The deliverer and individual receiving the delivery shall, at the time of
delivery, endorse a delivery form that the Board approves, certifying that:
(1) the individual receiving the delivery claimed to be at least 21 years old
and the claim was supported by documentary evidence;
– 1 –

Ch. 804 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) the individual receiving the delivery knew that it is a criminal offense
for alcoholic beverages to be given to an individual under the age of 21 years; and
(3) the deliverer examined the recipient’s identification.
(c) A license holder or an employee of a license holder may not make a retail
delivery of alcoholic beverages unless the purchaser:
(1) or another individual at least 21 years old designated by the purchaser,
is physically present to receive the alcoholic beverages at the time and place of delivery;
and
(2) pays for the purchase at the time of the order.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –